Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

David Crockett Commission

4-8-401. Creation — Purpose.

There is created the David Crockett commission, hereinafter “the commission,” to identify ways and means and raise the necessary funds to erect a monument or statue honoring David Crockett on the grounds of the state capitol as a permanent tribute to one of Tennessee’s most prominent citizens throughout its history.

Acts 2012, ch. 1064, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the creation of the David Crockett commission to oversee the erection of a monument or statue honoring David Crockett, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1064.

4-8-402. Composition of commission.

The commission shall be composed of nine (9) citizen members: five (5) members to be appointed by the governor, two (2) members to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and two (2) members to be appointed by the speaker of the senate. The governor shall designate one (1) member to serve as chair of the commission. Vacancies shall be filled by the original appointing authority. Members of the commission shall not receive travel expenses or compensation for their service; however, members of the commission may receive compensation or reimbursement for travel expenses from private sources.

Of the members appointed to the commission:

One (1) shall be a member of a Tennessee historical society or organization;

One (1) shall be an employee or director of a public museum with experience relative to commissioned projects;

One (1) shall have experience in fundraising for historical, artistic, or educational organizations or projects; and

One (1) shall be a resident of the eastern grand division from an area of David Crockett's birthplace or where he enjoyed his early childhood who is a member of a group that studies or celebrates David Crockett on an ongoing basis.

Acts 2012, ch. 1064, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the creation of the David Crockett commission to oversee the erection of a monument or statue honoring David Crockett, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1064.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

4-8-403. Consultation with state capitol commission — Approval of design.

The commission shall consult with the state capitol commission relative to all aspects of the monument or statue honoring David Crockett, and the state capitol commission must give final approval of the design of such monument or statue prior to its erection.

The commission is administratively attached to the department of finance and administration.

Acts 2012, ch. 1064, § 3; 2018, ch. 878, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the creation of the David Crockett commission to oversee the erection of a monument or statue honoring David Crockett, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1064.

4-8-404. David Crockett commission fund — Exhaustion of private funds before use of state funds.

The monument or statue of David Crockett may be erected using a combination of state and private funds. However, it is the general assembly's intent that any available private funding is used to the full extent possible and that no state funds shall be used for such project until all private funding is exhausted.

There is created a separate account within the state treasury to be known as the David Crockett commission fund.

The David Crockett commission fund is composed of:

Funds appropriated by the general assembly for the David Crockett commission fund; and

Gifts, grants, and other donations received by the commission for the David Crockett commission fund from nonstate sources.

Money in the David Crockett commission fund may be used by the commission for the purposes for which the commission was created.

At the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner of finance and administration shall carry forward any amounts remaining in the David Crockett commission fund.

Moneys in the David Crockett commission fund must be invested by the state treasurer pursuant to title 9, chapter 4, part 6, for the sole benefit of the David Crockett commission fund, and interest accruing on investments and deposits of such fund must be returned to such fund and remain part of the David Crockett commission fund.

After the termination of the commission pursuant to § 4-8-405, any moneys remaining in the David Crockett commission fund must remain in the fund and be expended for the upkeep and maintenance of the monument or statue until all funds in the account are exhausted.

Acts 2012, ch. 1064, § 4; 2018, ch. 878, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the creation of the David Crockett commission to oversee the erection of a monument or statue honoring David Crockett, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1064.

4-8-405. Report on operation and accomplishments — Termination of commission.

Within thirty (30) days of the erection of the monument or statue in accordance with this part, the David Crockett commission shall submit to the governor, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, and the chairs of the government operations committees of the house of representatives and senate a complete and detailed report setting forth its operation and accomplishments, at which time the commission shall cease to exist.

Acts 2012, ch. 1064, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning the creation of the David Crockett commission to oversee the erection of a monument or statue honoring David Crockett, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 1064.